Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202279-8,148
Teach in Nebraska Today Program; created; purpose.

The Teach in Nebraska Today Program is created. The department shall administer the program. The purpose of the program is to attract individuals to the teaching profession who have expressed an interest in teaching and to support the employment of those individuals as classroom teachers by providing student loan repayment assistance for service as a classroom teacher in this state.

Laws 2022, LB1218, § 3.